District of Columbia statutes.
7-3014

Repealed

Choice in Drug Treatment Advisory Commission.

Repealed.

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-146, § 15, 47 DCR 4350
May 18, 2004, D.C. Law 15-155, § 2, 51 DCR 3389
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 256, 62 DCR 1884
D.C. Law 15-155 rewrote the section.
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 256 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, Nov. 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 256 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).